Hawaii, session 2026, GM1260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the United States
Treasury has stopped minting the penny for general circulation,
which has created a shortage for many businesses in the State.
To protect the ability of businesses in the State to accept cash
payments and make change, rounding to the nearest five cents
should be permissible by law to address this urgent issue.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to enable cash
transaction rounding.
SECTION 2. Chapter 481B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
''§481B- Cash transaction rounding. (a)
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any person selling
goods or services in a cash transaction, entering into any other
transaction that results in a payment or transfer of cash
between the parties to the transaction, or paying cash wages to
an employee as compensation, may round the payment in the
2026-2483 SB3255 CDl SMA.docx
IIMIIilllllliliWIIIIIMBII

Page 2 S.B. NO.
■ - h.D. 2
C.D. 1
following manner for any person seeking to make payment with
legal tender;
(1) In any case in which the total transaction amount ends
with one cent, two cents, six cents, or seven cents as
the final digit, the amount of cents in the sum shall
be rounded down to the nearest amount divisible by
five;
(2) In any case in which the total transaction amount ends
with three cents, four cents, eight cents, or nine
cents as the final digit, the amount of cents in the
sum shall be rounded up to the nearest amount
divisible by five; and
(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) to the contrary, in any
case in which the total transaction amount totals one
cent or two cents, the transaction shall be rounded up
to five cents.
(b) Subsection (a) shall not apply to any transaction for
which payment is made by any demand or negotiable instrument,
elect^^nic_^und^_trans^^r^__check^__2ift__cat^2_JS2£®y_°£^®£z_-££®^i^.
card, or other like instrument or method.
2026-2483 SB3255 CDl SMA.docx
MliniigUUIHillllilHIMW

Page 3 S.B. NO. 3255
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(c) Notwithstanding section 480-2 or any other law to the
contrary, no person may bring a private action to enforce this
section.
(d) Any person who engages in cash transaction rounding
pursuant to this section shall not be subject to section
486-116.
(e) For the purposes of this section, "total transaction
amount" includes fees, surcharges, and taxes."
SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2483 SB3255 CDl SMA.docx 3
IIIIIMHIMIOinilllilli

S.B. NO.
^1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 25th day of June ,2026

S.B. No. 3255, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
76-26

SB No. 3255, SD 1,HD2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
f
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives